nb: Kasteavstand for straffeflagg: Langt kast; Standard; Annet
ro-RO: Distanța de aruncare a steagului de penalizare: Aruncare lungă; Standard; Altele
sl-SI: Razdalja meta sodniške zastavice: Dolgi met; Standardno; Drugo
en: Penalty flag throw distance: Long toss; Standard; Other
it: Distanza di lancio della bandierina: Lancio lungo; Standard; Altro
nl: Penaltyvlag werpafstand: Verre worp; Standaard; Overig
ru: Дистанция броска штрафного флага: Дальний бросок; Стандартный; Другое
tr: Ceza bayrağı atış mesafesi: Uzun atış; Standart; Diğer
zh-CN: 点球旗投掷距离: 长距离抛掷; 标准; 其他
zh-TW: 判罰旗投擲距離: 長距離投擲; 標準; 其他
ja: ペナルティフラッグの投擲距離: ロングトス; スタンダード; その他
cs: Vzdálenost hodu trestným praporkem: Dlouhý hod; Standardní; Ostatní
es: Distancia de lanzamiento del banderín de penalti: Lanzamiento largo; Estándar; Otro
el: Απόσταση ρίψης σημαίας πέναλτι: Μακρινή ρίψη; Τυπική; Άλλο
bg-BG: Дистанция на хвърляне на наказателен флаг: Дълго хвърляне; Стандартно; Друго
da: Kastafstand for straffeflag: Langt kast; Standard; Andet
ko: 페널티 플래그 투척 거리: 롱 토스; 표준; 기타
lt-LT: Baudų vėliavėlės metimo atstumas: Tolimas metimas; Standartinis; Kita
sv: Kastavstånd för straffflagga: Långt kast; Standard; Övrigt
hu: Büntetőzászló dobási távolsága: Hosszú dobás; Standard; Egyéb
pt-PT: Distância de lançamento da bandeira de penalização: Lançamento longo; Padrão; Outro
fi: Rangaistuslipun heittoetäisyys: Pitkä heitto; Vakio; Muu
pt-BR: Flag de penalidade distância de arremesso: Longo alcance; Padrão; Outro
hr-HR: Udaljenost bacanja kaznene zastavice: Dugo bacanje; Standardno; Ostalo
pl: Dystans rzutu flagi karnej: Długi rzut; Standardowy; Inne
fr: Distance de lancer du drapeau de pénalité: Lancer long; Standard; Autre
vi: Khoảng cách ném cờ phạt: Ném xa; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
sk-SK: Vzdialenosť doletu trestnej vlajky: Dlhý hod; Štandardný; Iné
de: Wurfweite der Strafflagge: Weiter Wurf; Standard; Sonstige
th: ระยะการโยนธงโทษ: ระยะไกล; ระยะมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ